Washington statutes.
RCW 18.233.020

Music therapy advisory committee.

(1) A music therapy advisory committee is created within the department. The committee consists of five members as follows: Three who practice as music therapists in Washington state, one member who is a licensed health care provider but not a music therapist, and one member who is a consumer.

(2) The secretary shall appoint all members of the advisory committee. All members must be familiar with the practice of music therapy and able to provide the department with expertise and assistance in carrying out the following duties pursuant to this chapter:

(a) Developing regulations; and

(b) Establishing standards of practice and professional responsibility for music therapists.

(3) Members shall serve a term of four years without compensation.

(4) Members may serve consecutive terms at the direction of the department. Any vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as regular appointments.

(5) The advisory committee shall meet at least once per year or as otherwise called by the department.

(6) The department shall consult with the advisory committee for issues related to music therapy licensure and renewal. The department shall provide analysis of disciplinary actions taken, appeals, denials, or revocations of licenses at least once per year.

[ 2023 c 175 s 3.]